Ohio, session 136, HB740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.776 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3701.776. (A) As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same meaning as in section 3701.74 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of health, in consultation with the director of veterans services, shall create a veterans medical benefits poster. The poster shall include information about the following institutions and programs: (1) The department of veterans services contact and web site information and applicable programs offered by the department; (2) The military injury relief fund under section 5902.05 of the Revised Code; (3) The United States department of veterans affairs veterans crisis line, including contact information for the crisis line; (4) The United States department of veterans affairs caregiver support program; (5) Military onesource; (6) Relink.org; (7) Substance abuse and mental health treatment programs available to veterans; (8) Veteran health care rights; (9) Legal services available to veterans; (10) The availability of any other benefit or service relevant to veterans health care that the directors determine should be included on the poster; (11) The importance of veterans sharing their veteran status with health care providers as such information may aid in diagnosis and may enable health care providers to identify available resources. (C) A health care provider may display a copy of the poster created under division (B) of this section in a conspicuous location. The director of health shall provide a copy of the poster free of charge at the request of a health care provider.